Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB514.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 177 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For any bridge on a state-maintained highway, the department may install,
in appropriate locations, a sign displaying the 988 national suicide
prevention and mental health crisis hotline.
(2) The department shall determine where signs under this section would be
physically feasible and appropriate on bridges where suicides by jumping
have occurred or are likely to occur.
(3) Signs installed under this section shall be designed to communicate that
dialing 988 on a telephone will connect callers to behavioral health and
suicide prevention services as provided in accordance with state and federal
laws governing the 988 number.
(4) Signs installed under this section shall conform to the standards and
specifications adopted under KRS 189.337.
(5) This section shall not be construed to create a private right of action by, or a
legal duty to, any party, and shall not be used to impose liability on the
department if a sign has or has not been installed on its property.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/30/2025 11:54 AM Jacketed